Hawaii statutes.
[§329-129] Prohibited acts; flammable
solvents. (a) No qualifying patient or primary caregiver shall use butane
to extract tetrahydrocannabinol from marijuana plants.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall
be guilty of a class C felony. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next